Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.050

Findings and determination—Minimum price.

Within three days after the hearing upon a proposal to dispose of county property, the county legislative authority shall make its findings and determination thereon and cause them to be spread upon its minutes and made a matter of record. The county legislative authority may set a minimum sale price on property that is proposed for sale.

[ 1991 c 363 s 67; 1963 c 4 s 36.34.050. Prior: 1945 c 254 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4014-4; prior: 1891 c 76 s 3; RRS s 4009.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.